Utah statutes.
32A-4-401.   Definitions -- Commission's power to grant licenses --
Limitations.
(1) (a)  For purposes of this part:
(i)  "Banquet" means an event:
(A)  for which there is a contract:
(I)  between any person and a person listed in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B); and
(II)  under which a person listed in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B) is required to
provide an alcoholic beverage at the event;
(B)  held at one or more designated locations approved by the commission in or
on the premises of a:
(I)  hotel;
(II)  resort facility;
(III)  sports center; or
(IV)  convention center; and
(C)  at which food and alcoholic beverages may be sold and served.
(ii)  "Convention center" is a facility that:
(A)  is in total at least 30,000 square feet; and
(B)  is otherwise defined as a "convention center" by the commission by rule.
(iii)  "Hotel" is as defined by the commission by rule.
(iv)  "Resort facility" is as defined by the commission by rule.
(v)  "Room service" means service of an alcoholic beverage to a guest room of
a:
(A)  hotel; or
(B)  resort facility.
(vi)  "Sports center" is as defined by the commission by rule.
(b)  The commission may grant an on-premise banquet license to any of the
following persons for the purpose of allowing the storage, sale, service, and
consumption of an alcoholic beverage in connection with that person's banquet
and room service activities:
(i)  a hotel;
(ii)  a resort facility;
(iii)  a sports center; or
(iv)  a convention center.
(c)  This chapter does not prohibit an alcoholic beverage on the premises of a
person listed in Subsection (1) to the extent otherwise permitted by this
title.
(2) (a)  Subject to this section and Subsection 32A-4a-201(2), the total
number of on-premise banquet licenses may not at any time aggregate more than
that number determined by dividing the population of the state by 30,000.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (2), the population of the state shall be
determined by:
(i)  the most recent United States decennial or special census; or
(ii) another population determination made by the United States or state
governments.
(3)  Pursuant to a contract between the host of a banquet and an on-premise
banquet licensee:
(a)  the host of a contracted banquet may request an on-premise banquet
licensee to provide an alcoholic beverage served at a banquet; and
(b)  an on-premise banquet licensee may provide an alcoholic beverage served
at a banquet.
(4)  At a banquet, an on-premise banquet licensee may provide:
(a)  a hosted bar; or
(b)  a cash bar.
(5)  Nothing in this section prohibits a qualified on-premise banquet license
applicant from applying for a package agency.
(6) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (6)(b), (c), or (d), the premises of
an on-premise banquet license may not be established:
(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method in
Subsection (6)(e); or
(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line
from the nearest entrance of the proposed outlet to the nearest property
boundary of the community location.
(b)  With respect to the establishment of an on-premise banquet license, the
commission may authorize a variance to reduce the proximity requirement of
Subsection (6)(a)(i) if:
(i)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing an on-
premise banquet license in the community are limited;
(iii)  the variance is authorized after a public hearing is held in the city,
town, or county, and where practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances
and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the license would not be detrimental to the
public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-
premise banquet license premises is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (6)(b)(v)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of an on-premise banquet license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-premise banquet
license premises is to be located for establishing an on-premise banquet
license to satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection (6)(b)(v)(B)(I).
(c)  With respect to the establishment of an on-premise banquet license, the
commission may authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of
Subsection (6)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the community location at issue is:
(A)  a public library; or
(B)  a public park;
(ii)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(iii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing an on-
premise banquet license in the community are limited;
(iv)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(v)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and
the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the on-premise banquet license would not be
detrimental to the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community;
and
(vi) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-
premise banquet license premises is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (6)(c)(vi)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of an on-premise banquet license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-premise banquet
license premises is to be located for establishing an on-premise banquet
license to satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection (6)(c)(vi)(B)(I).
(d)  With respect to the premises of any on-premise banquet license granted by
the commission that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission may waive
or vary the proximity requirements of Subsection (6)(a) in considering whether
to grant an on-premise banquet license to the new owner of the premises if:
(i) (A)  the premises previously received a variance reducing the proximity
requirement of Subsection (6)(a)(i); or
(B)  the premises received a variance reducing the proximity requirement of
Subsection (6)(a)(ii) on or before May 4, 2008; or
(ii)  a variance from proximity requirements was otherwise allowed under this
title.
(e) The 600 foot limitation described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) is measured from
the nearest entrance of the outlet by following the shortest route of ordinary
pedestrian travel to the property boundary of the community location.
(7) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the
proximity of any educational, religious, and recreational facility, or any
other relevant factor in reaching a decision on a proposed location.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (7), "educational facility" includes:
(i)  a nursery school;
(ii)  an infant day care center; and
(iii)  a trade and technical school.
(8) (a)  As used in this Subsection (8), "grandfathered facility" means a
facility:
(i)  for which the commission granted an on-premise banquet license that is in
effect on May 11, 2009, on the basis that the facility is a convention center;
and
(ii)  that no longer qualifies as a convention center under Subsection
(1)(a)(ii) solely because it is in total less than 30,000 square feet.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a)(ii), the on-premise banquet license
applicable to a grandfathered facility may be renewed until October 31, 2011,
if the on-premise banquet license is qualified for the on-premise banquet
license except for the requirement of Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(A).
